Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,159.02
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Act:

(1) Council means the Environmental Quality Council;

(2) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment;

(3) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment;

(4) Scrap tire or waste tire means a tire that is no longer suitable for its original intended purpose because of wear, damage, or defect;

(5) Tire means any tire made of rubber or other resilient material and normally used on any vehicle;

(6) Tire-derived product means the usable product produced from a scrap tire. Tire-derived product does not include crumb rubber or chipped tires not intended for a direct end use and does not include baled tires or tire-derived fuel; and

(7) Tire retailer means a person, business, or other entity which engages in the retail sale of tires in any quantity for any use or purpose by the purchaser other than for resale.

Laws 1994, LB 1034, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 495, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 143, § 10;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 131;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 421.